Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Chapter 5. Size, Weight and Load
§ 63-5-34.
Gross weight of vehicle and loads; exceptions.

For the purposes of Sections 63-5-29 and 63-5-33, any motor vehicle measuring more than twenty-nine (29) feet between the extreme axles with title to such vehicle registered with the State Tax Commission in accordance with the provisions of Section 63-21-1 et seq. may use public highways, excluding the federal interstate highway system, and be considered as a motor vehicle with a distance between the extreme of any group of axles twelve (12) feet longer than the extreme measurement of any such group.

Any motor vehicle that measures more than twenty-nine (29) feet and less than or equal to forty (40) feet between the extreme axles whose gross weight does not exceed seventy-two thousand (72,000) pounds on four (4) axles or seventy-three thousand two hundred eighty (73,280) pounds on five (5) axles, with title to such vehicle registered with the State Tax Commission on or before April 24, 1974, and in accordance with the provisions of Section 63-21-1 et seq., may use the federal interstate highway system and be considered as a motor vehicle with a distance between the extreme of any group of axles twelve (12) feet longer than the extreme measurement of any such group.

The provisions of this section may be superseded by action of the Mississippi Transportation Commission, by resolution spread upon its minutes, for any specified segment of a state highway or bridge in accordance with the provisions set forth in Section 65-1-45, when, due to any special weather or other hazard, such highways or bridges have been weakened or when such highways have substandard surfacing or weak bridges due to any cause.

This section shall not apply to situations in which its application would create a conflict with any length regulation or weight restriction imposed by federal law on the federal interstate highway system.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 574, § 2; Laws, 1976, ch. 455; Laws, 1978, ch. 486, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1980, ch. 353; Laws, 1983, ch. 463; Laws, 1993, ch. 478, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 27, 1993).

§ 63-5-35.
Factors to be considered by Mississippi Transportation Commission before increasing load limits.

It is the expressed intent of the Legislature that the Mississippi Transportation Commission shall take into consideration economic factors involving agriculture and industry within the State of Mississippi and shall allow such increased load limits pursuant to Section 63-5-33 for agricultural and industrial well-being where such is shown to be practical or necessary.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall designate Mississippi Highway 32 from its intersection with U.S. Highway 49 at Webb, Tallahatchie County, eastward to Charleston as eligible to carry the load limits scheduled in Section 63-5-33, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall designate Mississippi Highway 492 beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 21 and extending easterly to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 15 as eligible to carry the load limits scheduled in Section 63-5-33.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8271; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 307, § 4; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, § 6; Laws, 1954, ch. 335; Laws, 1958, ch. 501; Laws, 1960, ch. 409; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 22; Laws, 1964, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex Sess ch. 33; Laws, 1977, ch. 367; Laws, 2001, ch. 596, § 58; Laws, 2003, ch. 467, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2003.).

§ 63-5-37.
Axles suspended by equalizing system.

Any two or more axles close enough to be considered an axle group shall be suspended by an equalizing system in order to be eligible for the maximum load limits provided in Sections 63-5-29 through 63-5-33.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8271; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 307, § 4; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, § 6; Laws, 1954, ch. 335; Laws, 1958, ch. 501; Laws, 1960, ch. 409; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 22; Laws, 1964, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 33, eff from and after passage (approved July 15, 1964).

§ 63-5-39.
Inspection of certain vehicles upon registration; special permit; operation of vehicle or combination of vehicles in excess of gross weight limits.

The State Tax Commission and county tax collectors, upon registering any vehicle under the laws of this state, when the vehicle is designed and used primarily for the transportation of property or for the transportation of ten (10) or more persons, may require such information and may make such investigations and tests as may be necessary to enable them to determine whether such vehicle may safely be operated upon the highways in compliance with the provisions of this chapter. No vehicle shall be registered for a permissible gross weight in excess of the limitations set forth in this chapter unless a special permit is obtained as provided in Section 63-5-51, nor shall any temporary, trip, or other permit be issued for such vehicle for a gross weight in excess of the limitations set forth in this chapter unless such special permit is obtained. Every vehicle registered shall meet the following requirements:

It shall be equipped with brakes, as required in Sections 63-7-51 and 63-7-53.

Every motor vehicle to be operated outside of business and residence districts shall have motive power adequate to propel, at a reasonable speed, such vehicles and any load thereon or to be drawn thereby.

The State Tax Commission and the county tax collectors shall insert in the registration card issued for every such vehicle the gross weight for which it is registered, and, if it is a motor vehicle to be used for propelling other vehicles, they shall separately insert the total permissible gross weight of such vehicle and other vehicles to be propelled by it. The registration card issued for every such vehicle shall be carried in such vehicle at all times. They may also issue a special plate with such gross weight or weights stated thereon, which shall be attached to the vehicle and displayed thereon at all times. It shall be unlawful for any person to operate any vehicle or combination of vehicles of a gross weight in excess of that for which registered by the State Tax Commission or the county tax collector, or in excess of the limitations set forth in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8271; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 307, § 4; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, § 6; Laws, 1954, ch. 335; Laws, 1958, ch. 501; Laws, 1960, ch. 409; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 22; Laws, 1964, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex Sess ch. 33; Laws, 2001, ch. 596, § 59, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 63-5-41.
“Gross weight” and “gross load” defined.

“Gross weight” or “gross load,” as used in this chapter and elsewhere in this title, shall mean the actual weight of a vehicle, including all fixtures and equipment, plus any load being transported thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8271; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 307, § 4; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, § 6; Laws, 1954, ch. 335; Laws, 1958, ch. 501; Laws, 1960, ch. 409; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 22; Laws, 1964, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 33, eff from and after passage (approved July 15, 1964).

§ 63-5-43.
Enforcement of Sections 63-5-29 through 63-5-41.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall designate its agents to enforce Sections 63-5-29 through 63-5-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, and, upon the failure of any person so designated to enforce such sections, any executive order or directive to the contrary notwithstanding, he or they shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) for each such conviction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8271; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 307, § 4; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, § 6; Laws, 1954, ch. 335; Laws, 1958, ch. 501; Laws, 1960, ch. 409; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 22; Laws, 1964, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 33; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 63-5-45.
Transportation of perishable commodities of foreign import discharged at Mississippi ports.

The transportation by truck of perishable commodities of foreign import discharged at any port in the State of Mississippi shall not exceed sixty-four thousand, six hundred fifty (64,650) pounds load weight on vehicles having wheel base dimensions of not less than forty-five (45) feet, nor more than the maximum allowed by law for any weight. However, such weight and requirements with respect thereto shall never exceed federal limitations for the procurement of federal aid for either maintenance or construction of highways. For vehicles covered by this section, the Mississippi Department of Transportation may prescribe by regulation, from time to time, the number of wheels, axles, size and pressure of tires, and speed, and other related requirements when necessary to such vehicles, which it shall find and determine to be most desirable for the protection and safety of the public highways, considering the size and nature of such vehicles, all in accordance with federal requirements. Transportation permitted under this section shall be limited to the use of U.S. Highway 90 West from the City of Gulfport, Harrison County, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8271.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 485; Laws, 2001, ch. 596, § 60, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 63-5-47.
Transportation of commodities to or from terminal or port facilities on Mississippi River.

Motor vehicles engaged in transporting commodities to or from terminal or port facilities on the Mississippi River may be operated with a total weight and/or size in excess of limitations which may be specified by law, although such size or weight limitations shall never exceed federal limitations for the procurement of federal aid for either maintenance or construction, or the limitations then in force in any state immediately adjacent to the county in which such port or terminal facilities are located, provided that:

Said movement is wholly within a county which has therein a bridge across the Mississippi River.

The operation of such vehicle or vehicles with such gross weight shall first be approved by the Mississippi Department of Transportation, and a permit issued by said department specifying the roads, highways or streets within such county over which such vehicle or vehicles may be operated.

Said commodities have been received at such terminal or port facilities by water transportation and are destined for delivery across the bridge or said commodities have been received by movement across the bridge and are to be shipped from such terminal by water.

The operator of each and every motor vehicle operating under the provisions of this section shall, at all times, carry the permit issued by the said Mississippi Department of Transportation, or a certified copy thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8272.5; Laws, 1960, ch. 341; Laws, 2001, ch. 596, § 61, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 63-5-49.
Inspection and weighing of vehicles; assessment of penalty against owner or operator of overweight vehicle; removal of load in excess of legal limit; failure to stop and submit vehicle to inspection or weighing.

Any police officer, law enforcement officer of the Department of Public Safety or authorized enforcement officer of the Mississippi Department of Transportation may require the driver of any vehicle that is required by law or by any rule or regulation of the Mississippi Department of Transportation or the State Tax Commission to stop at inspection stations and submit to an inspection to stop and submit to a weighing of the vehicle, either by means of portable or stationary scales, and may require that such vehicle be driven to the nearest scales for weighing. To aid the enforcement of this chapter, the transportation department may assign up to forty (40) portable scale teams as it deems necessary for efficient enforcement.

Whenever such an officer, upon weighing a vehicle and load as above provided, determines that the weight is unlawful, such officer shall assess a penalty against the owner or operator in accordance with Section 27-19-89, and may require the driver to drive the vehicle to a suitable place and remain standing until such portion of the load is removed as may be necessary to reduce the gross weight of such vehicle to such limit as permitted under this chapter. All material so unloaded shall be cared for by the owner or operator of such vehicle at the risk of such owner or operator.

Any police officer, law enforcement officer of the Department of Public Safety, or authorized enforcement officer of the transportation department who stops a vehicle pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall have the authority to inspect such vehicle to determine whether or not such vehicle is engaged in the illegal transportation of any contraband.

Any driver of a vehicle who fails or refuses to stop and submit the vehicle and load to a weighing, or who fails or refuses, when directed by such an officer upon weighing of the vehicle, to stop the vehicle and otherwise comply with the provisions of this section, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by confinement in the county jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and jail sentence and, if operating at a gross weight in excess of the legal limit, such additional penalty or assessment as provided by law.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Public Safety and all police officers shall cooperate with the transportation department in the enforcement of the highway weight laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8272; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 307, § 5; Laws, 1950, ch. 482; Laws, 1981, ch. 366, § 9; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 21; Laws, 1994, ch. 382, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 63-5-51.
Special permits for excess size and weight; special permits for commercial movement of recreational vehicles and motor homes that comply with vehicle width requirements.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission with respect to highways under its jurisdiction and local authorities with respect to highways under their jurisdiction may, in their discretion, upon application in writing and good cause being shown therefor, issue a special permit in writing authorizing the applicant to operate or move a vehicle or combination of vehicles of a size or weight of vehicle or load exceeding the maximum specified in this chapter or otherwise not in conformity with the provisions of this chapter upon any highway under the jurisdiction of the party granting such permit and for the maintenance of which said party is responsible.

The application for any such permit shall specifically describe the general operation and load to be moved, and the particular highways for which the permit to operate is requested, and whether such permit is requested for a single trip, or for continuous operation.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission or local authority is authorized to issue or withhold such permit at its discretion. If such permit is issued, the Mississippi Transportation Commission or local authority is authorized to limit the number of trips, or to establish seasonal or other time limitations within which the vehicles described may be operated on the highways indicated, or otherwise to limit or prescribe conditions of operation of such vehicle or vehicles, when necessary to assure against undue damage to the road foundations, surfaces or structures. The Mississippi Transportation Commission or local authority may require such undertaking or other security as may be deemed necessary to compensate for any injury to any roadway or road structure.

Every such permit shall be carried in the vehicle or combination of vehicles to which it refers and shall be open to inspection by any police officer or authorized agent of any authority granting such permit, and no person shall violate any of the terms or conditions of such special permit. However, permits covering the number of vehicles anticipated in any operation may be issued by the commission.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission or local authorities, in their discretion, upon application in writing and good cause being shown therefor, issue a permit authorizing the commercial movement of one or more recreational vehicles or motor homes which comply with the provisions of Section 63-5-13. Such permits shall be valid for one (1) year from the date they are issued. A copy of the permit shall be carried with all such vehicles while they are being moved. The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to the commercial movement of vehicles under a permit issued pursuant to this subsection if such vehicles comply with Section 63-5-13.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8273; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 2000, ch. 318, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 63-5-52.
Special permits for vehicles transporting heavy equipment with nondivisible loads having gross vehicle weight of 150,000 pounds or less; transference of permit from one pulling unit to another.

In addition to other permits authorized to be issued for overweight loads, the Department of Transportation is authorized to issue annual special permits for vehicles transporting heavy equipment with a nondivisible load having a gross vehicle weight of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) pounds or less. The permit shall be issued for the pulling unit. The department may establish rules and regulations for the issuance and transference of the permit from one pulling unit to another. The fee for such permit shall be Four Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($4,500.00) and the permit shall expire one (1) year from the beginning movement date. Movements under such permit shall be made under such safety and equipment restrictions as the department may establish. The department shall specify the routes over which such movements may be conducted.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 538, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 312, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 337, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 63-5-53.
Liability for damage to highway or structure caused by vehicle.

Any person driving any vehicle, object, or contrivance upon any highway or highway structure shall be liable for all damage which said highway or structure may sustain as a result of any illegal operation, driving, or moving of such vehicle, object, or contrivance, or as a result of operation, driving, or moving any vehicle, object or contrivance weighing in excess of the maximum weight in this chapter but authorized by a special permit issued as provided in this chapter.

Whenever such driver is not the owner of such vehicle, object or contrivance, but is so operating, driving, or moving the same with the express or implied permission of said owner, then said owner and driver shall be jointly and severally liable for any such damage.

Such damage may be recovered in a civil action brought by the authorities in control of such highway or highway structure.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8274; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-5-55.
Spilling loads on highways.

No vehicle shall be driven or moved on any highway unless such vehicle is so constructed or loaded as to prevent any of its load from dropping, sifting, leaking, or otherwise escaping therefrom, except that sand may be dropped for the purpose of securing traction, or water or other substance may be sprinkled on a roadway in cleaning or maintaining such roadway.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8268; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.